Louisiana, session 2026, HB867.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:381(C)(38) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§381. Municipal officers
* * *
C.
* * *
(38) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the chief of
police of the town of Fordoche shall not be elected at large but shall be appointed by
the mayor upon approval by majority vote of the board of aldermen of the town.
However, no such appointment shall be made until the end of the term of the elected
chief of police in office on the effective date of this Paragraph, unless the office is
vacant or filled by an officer temporarily appointed as of that date. The term of
office of the chief of police shall be concurrent with that of the appointing mayor and
aldermen. The board of aldermen, upon recommendation of the mayor, shall
establish the salary of the chief of police and shall, by ordinance, establish the duties,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 867 ENROLLED
qualifications, and responsibilities of the chief of police. The chief of police shall
report directly to the mayor.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.